Washington statutes.
RCW 9.02.160

State-provided benefits.

If the state provides, directly or by contract, maternity care benefits, services, or information through any program administered or funded in whole or in part by the state, the state shall also provide pregnant individuals otherwise eligible for any such program with substantially equivalent benefits, services, or information to permit them to voluntarily terminate their pregnancies.

[ 2022 c 65 s 6; 1992 c 1 s 7 (Initiative Measure No. 120, approved November 5, 1991).]

NOTES:

Legislative affirmation—2022 c 65: See note following RCW 9.02.100.